Hawaii statutes.
§437B-23 Certification program. (a) The
board, at its sole discretion, may enter into written agreements with entities,
educational institutions, and other organizations to develop and administer a
certification program for motor vehicle mechanics that will provide education
and training in order to ensure that the mechanics' knowledge, skills, and
abilities are current with industry standards. The entities, educational
institutions, and other organizations shall have the range of expertise,
knowledge, and structure to provide instruction, information, guidance, and
services to assist mechanics in obtaining necessary competencies to engage in
motor vehicle repairs in order to protect consumers. Alternatively, the board
may accept certificates from a national certification program approved by the
board without the need to contract with the organization that administers the
national certification program.

(b) The certification program shall provide
for issuing a certificate to mechanics generally skilled in the repair of motor
vehicles and to mechanics who specialize in certain areas of motor vehicle
repair. An individual may be certified as being generally skilled in the
repair of motor vehicles, specially skilled in one or more areas of motor
vehicle repair, or both. Each area shall be separately tested and certified.
The program shall provide for apprenticeship leading to certification as a
mechanic. The program may be an apprenticeship program registered with the
department of labor and industrial relations in accordance with applicable
governing law. Nothing in this section or chapter shall prevent a student in a
course leading to certification from repairing motor vehicles so long as the
student is supervised by a mechanic who is licensed in accordance with this
chapter.

(c) The certification test shall be approved
by the board and, if written, shall be given orally at the request of the individual
being tested. Each application for certification shall be accompanied by a
nonrefundable examination fee as provided in rules adopted by the department
pursuant to chapter 91.

(d) There shall be no limit on the number of
times an individual may apply for certification; provided that an applicant who
does not pass the examination shall wait at least thirty calendar days before being
eligible to retake the test.

(e) All individuals who take and pass the
certification test shall be awarded a certificate which shall be posted in a
prominent place at the individual's place of business or employment and a patch
which may be worn on clothing apparel. The entity, educational institution, or
other organization who has entered into a written agreement with the board or
been approved by the board pursuant to subsection (a) shall design and procure
the certificate and patch. [L 1975, c 143, pt of §2; am L 1977, c 34, §3; am L
1984, c 7, §7; am L 1986, c 74, §3; am L 1988, c 128, §2; am L 1992, c 87, §9;
am L 2014, c225, §2]

Cross References

Professional testing services, see §26-9.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next